Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Chapter 09. Oil and Gas Exploration Incentive Credits.

Administrative Code. —

For exploration incentive credit, see 11 AAC 89.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter describing SB 151, which became
ch. 39, SLA 1994, that enacted this chapter, see 1993 Senate Journal 619 - 620.

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 4, 4SSLA 2016 (HB 247) which made changes to this chapter, see 2016 House Journal 1437 — 1439.

Sec. 41.09.010.
Exploration incentive credits.

History.

[Repealed, § 33 ch 4 4SSLA 2016.]

Sec. 41.09.020.
Regulations.

History.

[Repealed, § 33 ch 4 4SSLA 2016.]

Sec. 41.09.030.
Relationship to AS 38.05.

History.

[Repealed, § 33 ch 4 4SSLA 2016.]

Sec. 41.09.090.
Definitions.

History.

[Repealed, § 33 ch 4 4SSLA 2016.]